Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2360.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Chesapeake Bay Grant-Only Compliance Program Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Chesapeake Bay requirement." A requirement relating to Chesapeake Bay nutrient reduction, Chesapeake Bay sediment reduction or storm water management activity required solely to satisfy a Chesapeake Bay obligation.1234567891011121314151617181920 "Department." The Department of Environmental Protection of the Commonwealth."Fee." A charge, assessment, rate, surcharge or other monetary exaction imposed directly or indirectly, regardless of the label, method of calculation or billing mechanism."Municipal separate storm sewer system" or "MS4." As defined in 40 CFR 122.26(b)(18) and (19) (relating to storm water discharges (applicable to State NPDES programs, see § 123.25))."MS4 requirement." A requirement relating to an MS4, including a permit requirement."Program." The Chesapeake Bay Grant-Only Compliance Program established under section 4(a)."Property owner." A natural person, partnership, corporation, nonprofit entity, institution, authority or governmental entity that owns real property within this Commonwealth."Public body." A municipality, municipal authority, political subdivision or other public body in this Commonwealth.Section 3. Prohibition on certain fees.(a) Prohibition.--A public body may not impose, levy, collect or enforce a fee on a property owner for any of the following purposes:(1) To comply with an MS4 requirement.(2) To comply with a Chesapeake Bay requirement.(b) Prohibited authorization.--A public body may not adopt, enforce or rely on an ordinance, resolution, regulation, policy or other measure that authorizes a fee for a purpose prohibited under subsection (a).Section 4. Chesapeake Bay Grant-Only Compliance Program.(a) Establishment.--The Chesapeake Bay Grant-Only Compliance 20260HB2360PN3137 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Program is established in the department. The department shall administer the program to provide grants to public bodies for costs incurred to comply with MS4 requirements and Chesapeake Bay requirements.(b) Award and use of grants.--Subject to the availability of money, the department shall award grants under the program to a public body that is subject to an MS4 requirement or Chesapeake Bay requirement. A grant awarded under the program may be used only for costs incurred to comply with MS4 requirements and Chesapeake Bay requirements.(c) Exclusive source of funding.--Except for a grant match required of a public body, compliance with MS4 requirements and Chesapeake Bay requirements shall be funded exclusively through Federal funds, Commonwealth funds or other grant funding administered by the Commonwealth.(d) Collaboration.--The department shall collaborate with Federal and State agencies to secure funding for the program.Section 5. Limitation on enforcement.The department may not enforce an MS4 requirement or Chesapeake Bay requirement against a public body unless sufficient grant funding is available to pay 100% of the cost of compliance, as determined by the governing body of the public body.Section 6. Preemption.This act shall preempt an ordinance, resolution, regulation, policy or other measure of a public body to the extent that the ordinance, resolution, regulation, policy or other measure authorizes the imposition, levy, collection or enforcement of a fee for a purpose prohibited under section 3.Section 7. Repeals.20260HB2360PN3137 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The following are repealed insofar as they are construed to authorize the imposition, levy, collection or enforcement of a fee for a purpose prohibited under section 3:(1) Section 2705 of the act of May 1, 1933 (P.L.103, No.69), known as The Second Class Township Code.(2) 53 Pa.C.S. § 5607(d)(34) (relating to purposes and powers).Section 8. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2360PN3137 - 4 - 123456789